Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that solving the state's housing crisis requires a multipronged approach. Finding, acquiring, and holding land in the predevelopment phase is a time-consuming opportunity cost for all developers and is particularly acute for developers of affordable housing. The legislature also finds that the state needs more affordable housing, and land banks play a crucial role in the housing ecosystem by finding, acquiring, and holding land until a developer is ready to build on the parcel or parcels.(2) The legislature further finds that land banks provide a benefit to neighbors and the community by managing abandoned or underutilized properties, preventing blight and crime, and improving public health and safety. The state intends to enable land banks to operate regionally and provide incentives that result in reduced costs to hold property. In turn, land banks can coordinate with developers throughout their region to build mixed-income developments and give more Washingtonians a place to call home.(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to authorize land banking authorities to:(a) Operate as public land banks that hold property, tax-exempt, while preparing it for affordable housing and public benefit uses included with or attached to affordable housing;(b) Prioritize equity, displacement prevention, and use of land acquisition and disposition strategies to expand capacity and address historical racial segregation, redlining, steering, and land prospecting, that has led to disparities in access to education, living wage employment, affordable housing, and transportation, particularly for Black, indigenous, and other communities of color, to ensure that future development remedies rather than reinforces these patterns; and(c) Provide for governance and decision making that is representative, transparent, and inclusive so that land banking activities reflect the affordable housing needs of the region and help meet locally identified housing and infrastructure benchmarks.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The legislative authority of a city or county may authorize the establishment of a land bank authority by a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.730, a public housing authority established under chapter 35.82 RCW, or a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended. A city or county legislative authority must adopt an ordinance or resolution authorizing such entity to establish and operate a land bank. At a minimum, the ordinance or resolution must:(a) State the public purpose of the land bank authority, including acquiring, holding, managing, and transferring property for affordable housing consistent with adopted local housing plans and chapter 36.70A RCW;(b) Describe the governance or oversight structure applicable to the land bank authority; and(c) Authorize the land bank authority to acquire, hold, lease, and transfer real property, including transfers at less than fair market value in exchange for affordability requirements authorized under this chapter.(2) The legislative authorities of two or more contiguous counties may authorize the establishment of a land bank to be administered in accordance with an interlocal agreement.(3) "Land bank authority" means an entity authorized by ordinance or resolution of a city or county legislative authority to establish and operate a land bank.(4) "Land bank" means the inventory of real property acquired, held, leased, or transferred by a land bank authority for purposes consistent under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) A land bank authority may acquire, hold, manage, improve, lease, transfer, or dispose of real property to be used as affordable housing. Real property held in the inventory of a land bank must be legally owned by the land bank authority. A land bank authority may also enter into contracts necessary to prepare property for productive use, including clearing title, addressing outstanding liens or taxes, and undertaking predevelopment activities. However, an entity that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and operating a land bank authority may not build or construct housing.(2) Land acquisitions and dispositions must:(a) Be consistent with any existing local, regional, or state housing plans and chapter 43.185B RCW, including the antidisplacement policies in the comprehensive plans of the county or city where the land is located; and(b) Demonstrate alignment with adopted local housing targets under chapter 36.70A RCW.(3) A land bank authority may lease or sell land to a housing developer at less than market rate in exchange for compliance with affordability requirements. Such transfers are not required to be made to the highest bidder.(4) At least 50 percent of the land or property leased or sold by a land bank authority must include a covenant or deed restriction that the housing units developed or operated must maintain affordability requirements for at least 30 years as follows:(a) Rental housing units must be affordable to households with an income at or below 80 percent of the area median income; and(b) Owner-occupied housing units must be affordable to households with an income at or below 120 percent of the area median income.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) Each land bank authority must prepare an annual report. The annual report must include:(a) Real property parcels acquired, held, and transferred during the year;(b) The manner of disposition and alignment with local housing and land use plans;(c) How each action advanced a community benefit;(d) The purchase price and assessed value of each parcel acquired;(e) The sales price and assessed value of each parcel transferred;(f) The number of housing units developed on each parcel transferred;(g) The affordability covenants recorded for each parcel sold; and(h) Progress toward advancing equity, preventing displacement, and meeting locally identified housing needs.(2) A land bank authority must make annual reports publicly available and submit each report to any city or county in which it has acquired or transferred land or property in the last 12 months. Cities and counties receiving an annual report are encouraged to provide feedback on the land bank's activities and alignment with local housing and land use plans to help guide compliance with local and regional housing plans.Sec. 5. RCW 36.35.150 and 2016 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The county legislative authority may dispose of tax foreclosed property by private negotiation, without a call for bids, for not less than the principal amount of the unpaid taxes in any of the following cases: (a) When the sale is to any governmental agency and for public purposes; (b) when the county legislative authority determines that it is not practical to build on the property due to the physical characteristics of the property or legal restrictions on construction activities on the property; (c) when the property has an assessed value of less than ((five hundred dollars))$500 and the property is sold to an adjoining landowner; ((or)) (d) when no acceptable bids were received at the attempted public auction of the property, if the sale is made within ((twelve))12 months from the date of the attempted public auction; or (e) when the sale is to an entity operating a land bank authority under section 2 of this act.(2) A county legislative authority must prioritize the transfer of tax foreclosed property to an entity operating a land bank authority under section 2 of this act.(3) Except when a county legislative authority purchases the tax foreclosed property for public purposes or transfers the tax foreclosed property to an entity operating a land bank authority under section 2 of this act, the county legislative authority must give notice to any city in which any tax foreclosed property is located within at least ((sixty))60 days of acquiring such property, and the county may not dispose of the property at public auction or by private negotiation before giving such notice. The notice must offer the city the opportunity to purchase the property for the original minimum bid under RCW 84.64.080, together with any direct costs incurred by the county in the sale. If the city chooses to purchase the property, the following conditions apply:(a) The city must accept the offer within ((thirty))30 days of receiving notice, unless the county agrees to extend the offer;(b) The city must provide that the property is suitable and will be used for an affordable housing development as defined in RCW 36.130.010; and(c) The city must agree to transfer the property to a local housing authority, land bank authority, or ((other)) nonprofit entity eligible to receive assistance from the affordable housing program under chapter 43.185A RCW. The city must be reimbursed by the housing authority, land bank authority, or ((other)) nonprofit entity for the amount the city paid to purchase the property together with any direct costs incurred by the city in the transfer to the housing authority, land bank authority, or ((other)) nonprofit entity.Sec. 6. RCW 35.21.755 and 2020 c 20 s 1011 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730, 35.21.660, or 81.112.320, or a land bank authority established under section 2 of this act that is operated by a public corporation shall receive the same immunity or exemption from taxation as that of the city, town, or county creating the same: PROVIDED, That, except for (a) any property within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites, or (b) any property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that is used primarily for low-income housing, or that is used as a convention center, performing arts center, public assembly hall, public meeting place, public esplanade, street, public way, public open space, park, public utility corridor, or view corridor for the general public, or (c) any blighted property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that was acquired for the purpose of remediation and redevelopment of the property in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the city, town, or county in which the property is located, or (d) any property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation created under RCW 81.112.320, or (e) any property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation operating a land bank authority under section 2 of this act, any such public corporation, commission, or authority shall pay to the county treasurer an annual excise tax equal to the amounts which would be paid upon real property and personal property devoted to the purposes of such public corporation, commission, or authority were it in private ownership, and such real property and personal property is acquired and/or operated under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755, and the proceeds of such excise tax shall be allocated by the county treasurer to the various taxing authorities in which such property is situated, in the same manner as though the property were in private ownership: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of chapter 82.29A RCW shall not apply to property within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites and which is controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1, 1987: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That property within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or property which is listed on any federal or state register of historical sites and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1, 1976, shall receive the same immunity or exemption from taxation as if such property had been within a district listed on any such federal or state register of historical sites as of January 1, 1976, and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 which was in existence prior to January 1, 1976.(2) As used in this section:(a) "Low-income" means a total annual income, adjusted for family size, not exceeding ((fifty))50 percent of the area median income.(b) "Area median income" means:(i) For an area within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the area median income reported by the United States department of housing and urban development for that standard metropolitan statistical area; or(ii) For an area not within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the county median income reported by the department of commerce.(c) "Blighted property" means property that is contaminated with hazardous substances as defined under RCW 70A.305.020.Sec. 7. RCW 35.82.210 and 2000 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The property of an authority is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such property and an authority shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That, except for any property owned by a land bank authority operated by a public corporation under section 2 of this act, in lieu of such taxes an authority may agree to make payments to the city or the county or any such political subdivision for improvements, services and facilities furnished by such city, county or political subdivision for the benefit of a housing project, but in no event shall such payments exceed the amount last levied as the annual tax of such city, county or political subdivision upon the property included in said project prior to the time of its acquisition by the authority.(2) For the sole purpose of the exemption from tax under this section:(a) "Authority," in addition to the meaning in RCW 35.82.020, also means tribal housing authorities and intertribal housing authorities. "Authority" also means a land bank authority owned, operated, or controlled by a housing authority under section 2 of this act.(b) "Intertribal housing authority" means a housing authority created by a consortium of tribal governments to operate and administer housing programs for persons of low income or senior citizens for and on behalf of such tribes.(c) "Tribal government" means the governing body of a federally recognized Indian tribe.(d) "Tribal housing authority" means the tribal government or an agency or branch of the tribal government that operates and administers housing programs for persons of low income or senior citizens.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. (1) All real and personal property owned by a nonprofit organization operating a land bank authority under section 2 of this act is exempt from property taxation.(2) To qualify for this exemption, the nonprofit organization must be qualified for federal income tax exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)).Sec. 9. RCW 82.45.010 and 2025 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any 36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a 36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within 60 days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a 36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for 50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(u)(i) The sale by an affordable homeownership facilitator of self-help housing to a low-income household.(ii) The definitions in this subsection (3)(u) apply to this subsection (3)(u) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(A) "Affordable homeownership facilitator" means a nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization that is exempt from income tax under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of October 1, 2019, and that is the developer of self-help housing.(B) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(C) "Self-help housing" means dwelling residences provided for ownership by low-income individuals and families whose ownership requirement includes labor participation. "Self-help housing" does not include residential rental housing provided on a commercial basis to the general public.(v)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCWÂ  84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCWÂ  35.82.030Â orÂ  35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCWÂ  35.21.660Â orÂ  35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCWÂ  59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCWÂ  82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required toÂ pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (v)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "low-income" has the same meaning as in (u) of this subsection.(w)(i) Beginning January 1, 2026, the sale of qualified space in a development that qualifies for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010 to a nonprofit organization, a housing authority, or public corporation for use for an exempt community purpose.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(w), the following definitions apply:(A) "Affordable housing development" means a development with housing provided to households with a household income that does not exceed 80 percent of median household income at initial occupancy, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(B) "Exempt community purpose" means any use to provide a service that benefits affordable housing development tenants or the public including, but not limited to, health clinics, senior day care, food banks, community centers, and early learning facilities.(C) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), as amended.(D) "Qualified space" means any portion of an affordable housing development that is accessible to tenants or the public that constitutes a separate legal parcel of property under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.(x)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a land bank authority under section 2 of this act.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(x):(A) "Land bank authority" means an entity authorized by ordinance or resolution of a city or county legislative authority to establish and operate a land bank under this act.(B) "Land bank" means the inventory of real property acquired, held, leased, or transferred by a land bank authority for purposes consistent with this act.(iii) To claim the exemption under this subsection (3)(x), the land bank authority must, at the time of sale or transfer:(A) Provide a copy of the ordinance or resolution; and(B) Certify that the real property is being acquired, held, or transferred for purposes consistent with this act.(y)(i) A sale or transfer of real property by a land bank authority under section 2 of this act.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(y):(A) "Land bank authority" means an entity authorized by ordinance or resolution of a city or county legislative authority to establish and operate a land bank under this act.(B) "Land bank" means the inventory of real property acquired, held, leased, or transferred by a land bank authority for purposes consistent with this act.(iii) To claim the exemption under this subsection (3)(y), the land bank authority and the grantee must, at the time of sale or transfer:(A) Provide a copy of the ordinance or resolution; and(B) Certify that the real property is being acquired, held, or transferred for purposes consistent with this act.Sec. 10. RCW 82.45.010 and 2025 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any 36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a 36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a 36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for 50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(u)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCWÂ  84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCWÂ  35.82.030Â orÂ  35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCWÂ  35.21.660Â orÂ  35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCWÂ  59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCWÂ  84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210,Â  35.21.755, orÂ  84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCWÂ  82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required toÂ pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (u)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(v)(i) The sale of qualified space in a development that qualifies for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010 to a nonprofit organization, a housing authority, or public corporation for use for an exempt community purpose.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), the following definitions apply:(A) "Affordable housing development" means a development with housing provided to households with a household income that does not exceed 80 percent of median household income at initial occupancy, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(B) "Exempt community purpose" means any use to provide a service that benefits affordable housing development tenants or the public including, but not limited to, health clinics, senior day care, food banks, community centers, and early learning facilities.(C) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), as amended.(D) "Qualified space" means any portion of an affordable housing development that is accessible to tenants or the public that constitutes a separate legal parcel of property under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.(w)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a land bank authority under section 2 of this act.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(w):(A) "Land bank authority" means an entity authorized by ordinance or resolution of a city or county legislative authority to establish and operate a land bank under this act.(B) "Land bank" means the inventory of real property acquired, held, leased, or transferred by a land bank authority for purposes consistent with this act.(iii) To claim the exemption under this subsection (3)(w), the land bank authority must, at the time of sale or transfer:(A) Provide a copy of the ordinance or resolution; and(B) Certify that the real property is being acquired, held, or transferred for purposes consistent with this act.(x)(i) A sale or transfer of real property by a land bank authority under section 2 of this act.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(x):(A) "Land bank authority" means an entity authorized by ordinance or resolution of a city or county legislative authority to establish and operate a land bank under this act.(B) "Land bank" means the inventory of real property acquired, held, leased, or transferred by a land bank authority for purposes consistent with this act.(iii) To claim the exemption under this subsection (3)(x), the land bank authority and the grantee must, at the time of sale or transfer:(A) Provide a copy of the ordinance or resolution; and(B) Certify that the real property is being acquired, held, or transferred for purposes pursuant to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preferences in sections 6 through 10 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(a).(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to:(a) Encourage sales or transfers of real property to land bank authorities that intend the property to be used for affordable housing; and(b) Reduce the cost of land for housing development by allowing land bank authorities to own land or property without being subject to state or local property tax and to sell land or property without being subject to the real estate excise tax.(4) If a review finds that the tax preferences in sections 6 through 10 of this act have not reduced the cost of land for housing development, then the legislature intends to consider repealing the tax preferences.(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to any available data source, including county records identifying the assessed value, sales value, and number of housing units developed for any property acquired or transferred by a land bank authority.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 do not apply to sections 6 through 10 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Sections 2 through 4 and 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Section 9 of this act expires January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. Section 10 of this act takes effect January 1, 2030.--- END ---